Utah statutes.
76-10-3115.   Attorney general to advocate competition.

The attorney general shall have the authority and responsibility to advocate the policy of competition before all political subdivisions of this state and all public agencies whose actions may affect the interests of persons in this state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

